North Carolina, session 2025, HB1154.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Agriculture and Consumer Services the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the Carolina Farm Stewardship Association,
a nonprofit organization, to be used to provide grants to support the FarmSHARE program
administered by the Carolina Farm Stewardship Association in working with partners across the
State to purchase locally grown food and distribute it free to food-insecure individuals and
households across North Carolina.
SECTION 1.(b) Until all funds appropriated by this section have been expended, the
Department shall annually report no later than October 1 from the Carolina Farm Stewardship
Association during the prior fiscal year to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division on at least
all of the following:
(1) The number of local farmers participating in the program.
(2) The participating food hub locations and community organizations, including
location type, providing access to participants in the program.
(3) The amount of food distributed by pound and number of food boxes
distributed annually.
SECTION 2.(a) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services (Department) the sum of two million
dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a grant to the
North Carolina Farmers Market Network, a nonprofit organization, for a grant program
administered through its Double Up Food Bucks Program to make fresh fruits and vegetables
sold at farmers markets, food hubs, and other direct agricultural retail outlets accessible to
individuals and families who reside in the State and receive assistance through any federal or
State nutrition assistance programs. For purposes of this section, the term "fruits and vegetables"
includes any variety of fresh, canned, dried, or frozen fruits and vegetables without added
sodium, sugars, fats, or oils.
SECTION 2.(b) Report. – The Department shall annually report no later than
October 1 until all funds have been expended to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
*H1154-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division on the grants
provided under this section during the prior fiscal year. The report shall include, at a minimum,
all of the following:
(1) The number of nutrition assistance participants receiving grants through the
program.
(2) The number of local farmers participating in the program.
(3) A list of each participating location, categorized by location type, providing
access to participants in the program.
(4) The amount of financial benefits redeemed by participants during the prior
fiscal year.
(5) An assessment of the rate in which participants redeemed any financial
benefits made available by the program during the prior fiscal year.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1154-First Edition